Utah statutes.
26-2-24.   Marriage licenses -- Execution and filing requirements.

The state registrar shall supply county clerks with application forms for marriage licenses. Completed applications shall be transmitted by the clerks to the state registrar monthly. The personal identification information contained on each application for a marriage license filed with the county clerk shall be entered on a form supplied by the state registrar. The person performing the marriage shall furnish the date and place of marriage and his name and address. The form shall be completed and certified by the county clerk before it is filed with the state registrar.

